src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON HARVVIS   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Contr, CG and -is -> -á, attr -e, short comp forms
 :e%> ATTR ;
 :is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A:át SHORTCOMP ;
 :i%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 :á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;

LEXICON MALLASadj- !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +Cmp/SgGen:a       R                    ; ! !compound also for these
 +Cmp/SgGen+Use/-PLX:        R                    ; !compound also for these
             +Sg+Nom:00      NPxC                 ;
             +Sg+Gen:a       K                    ;
!    +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:        K                    ;
             +Sg+Gen:        NPxC                 ;
             +Sg+Acc:a       K                    ;
!    +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:        K                    ;
             +Sg+Acc:        NPxC                 ;
             +Pl+Nom:at      K                    ;
    +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:ak      K                    ;
             +Sg+Ill:asa%>   NPxVvowch            ;
!   +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:ijddá%> NPx1V                ; ! not this TT, BÁB
                    :i       MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;

LEXICON MALLASadj-_MINIP !!≈ * **@CODE@**  for giving Use/NGminip-tags
 +Sg+Nom:00 NPxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
! +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:a R ; ! !compound also for these
 +Cmp/SgGen+Use/-PLX: R ; !compound also for these
 +Sg+Gen: NPxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
! +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc: K ;
 +Sg+Acc: NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:at K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:ak K ;
 +Sg+Ill:asa%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Nom:ijddá%> NPx1V ; ! not this TT, BÁB
 :i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;


LEXICON MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
! +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:jnna K ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:jd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:jnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Loc:stti%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Com:jnni%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Nom:jddi%> NPxVvowch ; !^P^ ! was commented out...
 +Pl+Gen:jddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc:jddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:jddás%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:jnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Com:jddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;

LEXICON DEVNVCASE  !!≈ * @CODE@  bisyllabic nominal declension
 GOAHTI-NEadj ;
 GOAHTI-OBLadj ;

LEXICON GOAHTI-OBLadj  !!≈ * @CODE@
 +Sg+Nom:X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen:X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Nom:X2 NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Gen:X6 NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X6 NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Ill:X2s%> NPxC ;
 :X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :X4 GOADIadj- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 :^DISIMP GODIIadj- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
! +Err/Orth: GOAHTE- ;	!


LEXICON GOAHTI-ADJ_CGforms !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Adjs. Forms that usually get CG. This lexicon is mostly meant for adding Err/Orth forms wihtout CG to lemmas, which should have CG, 
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 :%>^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl


LEXICON GOAHTI-NEadj !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 NomVadj ;
 EssVadj ;

LEXICON GODIIadj- !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Nom:jd%> NPxC ; !changed Px1C into PxC, TT. LA: Bare noen familyord får Px for Pl Nom
 +Pl+Gen:jd9 K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:jd R ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc:jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com:jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:jn%> NPxPlComC ;

LEXICON GOADIadj- !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG: R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Sg+Gen: NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc: NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:st%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:k K ;


LEXICON NomVadj  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: NPx3V ;
 +Cmp/SgNom: R ; ! we have +Cmp/Attr, so see whether we do without
                 ! SNM 19.9.2019: commented back in - it is needed for
                 ! adjectives that specify SgNom as one of the compounding
                 ! patterns, such as _somá_
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđi K ;


LEXICON EssVadj !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess:n%> NPxC ;



! -------------
!! ## Special cases
! -------------

LEXICON VEARATAG !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +A+Attr+MWE:% veara K ; ! namuhan veara
 +A+Sg+Nom+MWE:% veara K ;
 +Adv+MWE:% veara K ;
 +Adv+MWE:% veara%>n K ;
 +A+Attr+Err/MissingSpace:∑#veara K ; ! namuhanveara
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/MissingSpace:∑#veara K ;
 +Adv+Err/MissingSpace:∑#veara K ;
 +Adv+Err/MissingSpace:∑#veara%>n K ;
 
LEXICON VEARA !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Cmp#veara+A+Attr+Err/MissingSpace:∑#veara K ;
 +Cmp#veara+A+Sg+Nom+Err/MissingSpace:∑#veara K ;
 +Cmp#veara+Adv+Err/MissingSpace:∑#veara K ;
 +Cmp#veara+Adv+Err/MissingSpace:∑#veara%>n K ;



!! ## Final note on the adjective sublexica
!-------------------------------------

!! todo: Rewrite the adj lexica so that the attr variation is kept separate
!! from the otherwise uniform declension.



LEXICON VUDDJI- !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 BOHCCOadj ;
 BOHCCUadj ;

LEXICON BOHCCOadj !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Nom: NPxV  ;
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: NPxV  ;
 +Cmp/SgGen: R ; 		! Already in LEXICON BOAZU
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Sg+Acc: NPxV  ;
 +Sg+Ill:s%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:st%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:k K ; ! !Skániid dialect

LEXICON BOHCCUadj !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:jd R ;
 +Pl+Nom:jd%> NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc:jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:j∑- ENDLEX ;  !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com:jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:jn%> NPxPlComC ;






!! # Adjective declension
! - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON ATTR  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  This is the normal lexicon for ATTR forms
                    +Attr:    K                   ; ! Plain attributive
                +Cmp/Attr:    Rreal               ;
    +Attr+Use/-PLX+Use/NG:    VUOHTA              ; ! Nielsen p. 212: vuottâ føiet til _nominativ_formen av adjektiver
       +Use/-PLX+Cmp/Attr:    NAMAT               ; ! comp-only adj     ! Added #, and removed # again.
                    +Attr:#   NAMATLAGANLAGASCont ;
!              #+Use/-PLX:   NAMAT               ; ! comp-only adj     ! Added #, and removed # again.
  +Use/Circ+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#:#   ALIT                ; ! both comp and independent adj !

LEXICON ATTRCONT  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  This lexicon is for forms with non-sub Attr, where we sub the rest.
                +Attr:  K                   ; ! Comp are also Attr.
   +Err/Orth+Cmp/Attr:  Rreal               ;
            +Err/Orth:  NAMAT               ; ! comp-only adj, not compound
       +Attr+Err/Orth:# NAMATLAGANLAGASCont ;
!          #+Err/Orth: NAMAT               ; ! comp-only adj
  +Use/Circ+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#:#   ALIT                ; ! both comp and independent adj !


LEXICON LAIKI0     !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Directing adjectives ...
            DEVNVCASE ; ! ... to bisyllabic nominal declension
 +Use/-PLX: VUOHTA    ; ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation



LEXICON ISSORASSA2-
 +Sg+Nom: NPxVvowch ; ! ! tentative.
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess:n%> NPxC ; ! ! tentative, check.
 +Use/NG:X4 BU/MUS ;
 HEAPMIOBL ;


LEXICON ISSORASSA- !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Nom: NPxVvowch ; ! ! tentative.
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:t K ;
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess:n%> NPxC ; ! ! tentative, check.
 :X4 BU/MUS ;
 HEAPMIOBL ;


LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS !!≈ * **@CODE@** comparision for trisyllable adjectives
 ADVC ;
 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;

LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_MINIP !!≈ * **@CODE@**  for giving Use/NGminip-tags
 ADVC ;
 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT_MINIP ;
