src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON NomActVEARA !!= * **@CODE@** hardcoded postposition frases with veara, for speller
namuhan% veara:namuhan VEARATAG ;
dadjan% veara:dadjan VEARATAG ;
mearkkašan% veara:mearkkašan VEARATAG ;
imaštallan% veara:imaštallan VEARATAG ;
imaštan% veara:imaštan VEARATAG ;
moaitin% veara:moaitin VEARATAG ;
eallin% veara:eallin VEARATAG ;
doarjun% veara:doarjun VEARATAG ;
rápmun% veara:rápmun VEARATAG ;
divvun% veara:divvun VEARATAG ;
geahččan% veara:geahččan VEARATAG ;
giitin% veara:giitin VEARATAG ;
čállin% veara:čállin VEARATAG ;
guldalan% veara:guldalan VEARATAG ;
gáhtan% veara:gáhtan VEARATAG ;
šállošan% veara:šállošan VEARATAG ;
lohkan% veara:lohkan VEARATAG ;
jurddašan% veara:jurddašan VEARATAG ;
hupman% veara:hupman VEARATAG ;
váidin% veara:váidin VEARATAG ;
rámpon% veara:rámpon VEARATAG ;
rámidan% veara:rámidan VEARATAG ;
máinnastan% veara:máinnastan VEARATAG ;
cuiggodan% veara:cuiggodan VEARATAG ;
vásihan% veara:vásihan VEARATAG ;
jurdilan% veara:jurdilan VEARATAG ;
dutkan% veara:dutkan VEARATAG ;
jearran% veara:jearran VEARATAG ;
dubmen% veara:dubmen VEARATAG ;
máinnašan% veara:máinnašan VEARATAG ;
smiehttan% veara:smiehttan VEARATAG ;
suodjalan% veara:suodjalan VEARATAG ;
máidnun% veara:máidnun VEARATAG ;
čuohppan% veara:čuohppan VEARATAG ;
vurkkodan% veara:vurkkodan VEARATAG ;
fuomášuhttin% veara:fuomášuhttin VEARATAG ;
bivdin% veara:bivdin VEARATAG ;
gilvin% veara:gilvin VEARATAG ;
ráŋggáštan% veara:ráŋggáštan VEARATAG ;
seailluhan% veara:seailluhan VEARATAG ;
juoigan% veara:juoigan VEARATAG ;
návddašan% veara:návddašan VEARATAG ;
heahpanan% veara:heahpanan VEARATAG ;
deattuhan% veara:deattuhan VEARATAG ;
digaštallan% veara:digaštallan VEARATAG ;
gáđaštan% veara:gáđaštan VEARATAG ;
muittuhan% veara:muittuhan VEARATAG ;
čuožžun% veara:čuožžun VEARATAG ;
oaidnin% veara:oaidnin VEARATAG ;
fuomášan% veara:fuomášan VEARATAG ;
muitin% veara:muitin VEARATAG ;
gullan% veara:gullan VEARATAG ;
gáhtten% veara:gáhtten VEARATAG ;
geahččalan% veara:geahččalan VEARATAG ;
čujuhan% veara:čujuhan VEARATAG ;
muittašan% veara:muittašan VEARATAG ;
roggan% veara:roggan VEARATAG ;
diehtin% veara:diehtin VEARATAG ;
háhpohallan% veara:háhpohallan VEARATAG ;
mearkkašahttin% veara:mearkkašahttin VEARATAG ;
muitalan% veara:muitalan VEARATAG ;
čevllohallan% veara:čevllohallan VEARATAG ;
namahan% veara:namahan VEARATAG ;
beroštan% veara:beroštan VEARATAG ;
berostan% veara:berostan VEARATAG ;
ráhkistan% veara:ráhkistan VEARATAG ;
joatkin% veara:joatkin VEARATAG ;
váivvi% veara:váivvi VEARATAG ;
váivve% veara:váivve VEARATAG ;
LEXICON AdjectiveNoPx !!= * **@CODE@** is the main adjective list, not taking Px
bassi+A+Sem/Dummytag:bassi LAIKI0 ;
boaris+A+Sem/Hum+Err/Orth-a-á:boarras EABBO/EAMOS ;
boaris+A+Sem/Hum+Err/Orth-a-á:boarras MALLASadj- ;
buohcci+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:%>buohcci¤ LAIKI0 ;
divttis+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:divºtis MALLASadj- ;
erenoamáš+A+Sem/Dummytag:erenoamáž EABBO/EAMOS ;
erenomáš+A+Sem/Dummytag+Dial/-GG:erenomáž EABBO/EAMOS ;
earenoamáš+A+Sem/Dummytag+Dial/-KJ:earenoamáž EABBO/EAMOS ;
earenomáš+A+Sem/Dummytag:earenomáž EABBO/EAMOS ;
friddja+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:friddjas EABBO/EAMOS ;
friija+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:friijas EABBO/EAMOS ;
gievra+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:gievras%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
gievra+A+Sem/Hum+Err/Orth:gievra GOAHTI-ADJ_CGforms ;
govdat+A+Use/NG+Sem/Dummytag:govdes ATTR ; !unusual attr.form
govdat+A+Sem/Dummytag+Err/Orth:govdadis ATTR ; 
hárvvis+A+Sem/Dummytag:hárºv HARVVIS ;
njunuš+A+Sem/Dummytag+Err/Lex:njunnoš EABBO/EAMOS ;
máŋggabealat+A+Sem/Dummytag:máŋgga#bealag EABBO/EAMOS ;
siviila+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:siviila GOAHTI-ADJ_CGforms ;
veahkat+A+Sem/Hum+Err/Orth:veahkadis ATTR ;
várveš+A+Sem/Dummytag+Err/Orth:várveš ATTR ;
čorgat+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:čorgis ATTR ;
čorgat+A+Sem/Dummytag:čorges ATTR ;
